Colorado, session 2025B, HB1004.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly oft he State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add pa114 to article 36
of title 24 as follows:
PART4
SALE OF INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

24-36-401. Legislative declaration -tax preference performance
statement. ( 1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY THIS
PART 4 ARE NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE AN OBLIGATION OF
PAYMENT IN ANY FUTURE YEAR ON THE STATE;
(b) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF INSURANCE PREMIUM
TAX CREDITS DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STA TE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STATE REVENUE;
( C) THE SALE AND USE OF THE TAX CREDITS SHALL NOT BE DEEMED
OR CONSTRUED AS CREA TING INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER FINANCIAL
OBLIGATION WHATSOEVER WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY PROVISION OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE STA TE CONCERNING OR LIMITING
THE CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION BY THE
STATE;
(d) THE TAX CREDITS ALLOW AN INSURANCE COMPANY WITH AN
INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY TO PREPAY ITS TAX LIABILITY FOR
FUTURE YEARS, WHICH DOES NOT CONSTITUTE ATA X POLICY CHANGE UNDER
SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION; AND
( e) ANY PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE
OFFSET BY DECREASES IN FUTURE REVENUE RESULTING FROM THE BUYER'S
USE OF THE TAX CREDITS AND THEREFORE WILL NOT CAUSE A NET TAX
REVENUE GAIN UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(2) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEWTA X EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND
DECLARES THATTHEGENERALPURPOSES OF THE TAX CREDITS PROVIDED FOR
IN THIS PART 4 ARE TO INDUCE CERTAIN DESIGNATED BEHAVIOR BY
TAXPAYERS AND PROVIDE A REDUCTION IN INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX
LIABILITY FOR CERTAIN BUSINESSES. SPECIFICALLY, THIS TAX EXPENDITURE
IS INTENDED TO INDUCE INSURANCE COMPANIES TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS
THAT WILL REDUCE THEIR FUTURE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY IN
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 258-1004

ORDER TO GENERATE MONEY FOR THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON THE
NUMBER AND VALUE OF THE CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE TOTA L AMOUNT OF
GENERAL FUND MONEY GENERA TED. THE DIVISION OF INSURANCE SHALL
PROVIDE THE STATE AUDITOR WITH INFORMATION REGARDING THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE GENERAL FUND MONEY GENERATED.
24-36-402. Definitions. As USED IN THIS PART 4, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
( 1) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY.
(2) "DIVISION OF INSURANCE" MEANS THE DIVISION OF INSURANCE
IN THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES CREATED IN SECTION
10-1-103.
(3) "PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY" MEANS THE LIABILITY IMPOSED BY
SECTION 10-3-209 OR 10-6-128, OR, IN THE CASE OF A REPEAL OR REDUCTION
BYTHESTATEOFTHELIABILITY IMPOSEDBYSECTION 10-3-209 OR 10-6-128,
ANY OTHER TAX LIABILITY IMPOSED UPON AN INSURANCE COMPANY BY THE
STATE.
(4) "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" MEANS AN INSURANCE COMPANY
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS PREMIUM TAX
LIABILITY OWING TO THE STA TE AND THAT PURCHASES ATA X CREDIT UNDER
THIS PART 4. "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" ALSO INCLUDES AN INSURANCE
COMPANY THAT RECEIVES OR ASSUMES A TAX CREDIT TRANSFERRED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-403 (7)(e) OR 24-36-404 (5).
(5) "TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-403.
( 6) "TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS" OR "SALE PROCEEDS" MEANS THE
MONEY OR OTHER LIQUID ASSET ACCEPTABLE TO THE STATE TREASURER
THATAQUALIFIEDTAXPAYERPAYSTOTHEDEPARTMENTTHATISDEPOSITED
IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND CREA TED IN SECTION
24-36-405 (1).
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

24-36-403. Insurance premium tax credits - purchase -
authorization to issue - terms - report. (I) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY
PURCHASE INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX CREDITS FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND MAY APPLY THE TAX CREDITS
AGAINST ITS PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
24-36-404.
(2) (a) (I) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4 AND
PART 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL FACE VALUE
OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS, PLUS ANY
REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING
COSTS.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FIRST OFFER FOR SALE TAX CREDITS TO
A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT HAS A QUALIFIED HOME OFFICE OR REGIONAL
HOME OFFICE IN THIS STA TE, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF
INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-209 (l)(b)(Ill), AND SHALL ISSUE
ANY CORRESPONDING TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES TO A QUALIFIED TAX PA YER
PURCHASING THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION BEFORE
OFFERING FOR SALE TAX CREDITS TO ANY OTHER POTENTIAL PURCHASER.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENTTHIRD
PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG QUALIFIED
TAXPAYERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
( C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH INSURANCE COMPANIES
IN ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(3) AN INSURANCE COMPANY AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN
COLORADO SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS MUST APPLY TO THE
DEPARTMENT IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(4) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH INSURANCE COMPANY
THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND IRREVOCABLE
OFFER, CONTINGENT ONLY ON THE DEPARTMENT'S ISSUANCE TO THE
INSURANCE COMPANY OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, TO MAKE A
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

SPECIFIED PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON DATES
SPECIFIEDBYTHEDEPARTMENT, WHICHMUSTNOTBURDENANYSINGLETAX
YEAR. THE OFFER MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT BE
LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(b) THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE THE GREATER OF
EITHER:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS AS
OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(II) EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS; AND
( c) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE,
THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
INSURANCECOMPANYTHATSUBMITSAN APPLICATION INDICATING WHETHER
THE INSURANCE COMPANY HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A PURCHASER OF TAX
CREDITS AND, IF SO, THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS ALLOCATED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS MUST BE
MADE.
(6) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE:
(a) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF PREMIUM TAX CREDITS THAT THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM;
(b) THE AMOUNT THAT THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER HAS PAID OR
AGREED TO PAY IN RETURN FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE PAYMENT;
( c) THE DA TES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE FOR
USE BY THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER;
( d) ANY PENAL TIES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
(e ) THE PROCEDURES TO BE USED FOR TRANSFERRING OR ASSUMING
THETAXCREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7)(e) OF THIS SECTION
OR SECTION 24-36-404 (5);
(f) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(g) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(7) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED TAX PA YER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES.
(b) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES IS SUBJECT TO
APENALTYEQUALTOTENPERCENTOFTHEAMOUNTOFTHEPURCHASEPRICE
THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO THE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE DEFAULTED
TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS, SO THAT THE RESULT
AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL ALLOCATION HAD BEEN
PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(d) IFTHEREALLOCATIONOFTAXCREDITS UNDERSUBSECTION (7)(c)
OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER OF THE AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS NOT PAID BY THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE
PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED MAY A VOID THE IMPOSITION OF
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

THE PENALT Y BY TRANSFERRING THE ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS TO A NEW
OR EXISTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE
DATE OF THE DEFAULTED INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7) SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS AFTER THE DA TE OF THE TRANSFER.
(8) THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS PROVIDED BY A QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER IN RETURN FOR ATA X CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST BE DEPOSITED
IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-405 (1).
(9) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS
AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR, A DAT A FILE TO THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE AND THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN
WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4. THE
DATA FILE MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND IDENTIFYING NUMBER ISSUED BY THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY SUCCESSOR
ORGANIZATION, OFEACHQUALIFIEDTAXPAYER TO WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
ISSUED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
(III) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF EACH TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED, TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT ARE
SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OR THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE TO VERIFY THE ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE CREDIT. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE RECORDS TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR UPON REQUEST SO THAT THE STATE AUDITOR CAN EVALUATE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS
24-36-401 (2)(b) AND 39-21-305.
(10) THEDEPARTMENTMAYPAYANINDEPENDENTTHIRDPARTYAND
ANY CONSULTANTS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE,
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS USING THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF
TAX CREDITS.
24-36-404. Use of insurance premium tax credits - carry over.
(1) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF STA TE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, PRIOR TO THE SALE, MAY DETERMINE THE CALENDAR YEARS IN
WHICH THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S
TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY.
(2) THE TOTAL CREDIT TO BE APPLIED BY A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER IN
ANY ONE YEAR MUST NOT EXCEED THE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY OF THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR. IF THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
CANNOT USE THE ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR IN WHICH THE TAXPAYER IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT, THE EXCESS
MAY BE CARRIED OVER TO SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEARS AND USED AS A
CREDIT AGAINST THE PREMIUM TAX LIABILITY OF THE TAXPAYER FOR THOSE
TAXABLE YEARS; EXCEPT THAT THE CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED OVER TO
ANYTAXABLEYEARTHATBEGINSAFTERDECEMBER3 l,2033.ANY AMOUNT
OF THE CREDIT THAT IS NOT TIMELY CLAIMED EXPIRES AND IS NOT
REFUNDABLE.
(3) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS PART 4
SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS TAX RETURN.
(4) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
PART 4 SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY ANY ADDITIONAL OR RETALIATORY
TAX AS A RESULT OF CLAIMING THE CREDIT.
( 5) IF A QUALIFIED TAX PA YER HOLDING AN UNCLAIMED TAX CREDIT
IS PART OF A MERGER, ACQUISITION, OR LINE OF BUSINESS DIVESTITURE
TRANSACTION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO AND ASSUMED BY
THE RESULTING ENTITY IF THE RESULTING ENTITY IS AN INSURANCE
COMPANY AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS PREMIUM
TAX LIABILITY. THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT ORIGINALLY PURCHASED
THE CREDIT AND THE RES UL TING ENTITY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN
WRITING OF THE TRANSFER OR ASSUMPTION OF THE CREDIT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT. THE TRANSFER OR
ASSUMPTION OF THE TAX CREDIT DOES NOT AFFECT THE TIME SCHEDULE FOR
CLAIMING THE TAX CREDIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 25B-l 004

( 6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A REPORT TO THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4 WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE NAME AND IDENTIFYING NUMBER ISSUED BY THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY SUCCESSOR
ORGANIZATION,OFEACHQUALIFIEDTAXPAYERTOWHICHTHEDEPARTMENT
ISSUED A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(b) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
( C) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED,
TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DIVISION OF
INSURANCE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES TO VERIFY THE
ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE TAX CREDIT.
24-36-405. Tax credit sale proceeds cash fund -creation. ( 1) THE
TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE
TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY GENERATED BY SALE PROCEEDS
CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-406 AND ANY OTHER
MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO
THE FUND.
(2) THE STA TE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME
DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND TO THE FUND.
(3) THE STAT E TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ANY UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS
CASH FUND AT THE END OF A FISCAL YEAR TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(4) (a) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR ANY
REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING PARTS 4 AND
5 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(b) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE
FUND FOR DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH IMPLEMENTING
AND ADMINISTERING PARTS 4 AND 5 OF THIS ARTICLE.
24-36-406. Distribution of sale proceeds. EACH MONTH, THE STA T E
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY GENERATED BY THE SALE PROCEEDS
PURSUANT TO PARTS 4 AND 5 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 TO THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS CASH FUND. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSFER THE MONEY TO
THE GENERAL FUND LESS ANY AMOUNTS USED FOR THE EXPENSES DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 24-36-405 (4).
24-36-407. Repeal of part. THIS PART 4 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE
DECEMBER 31, 2040.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article 36
of title 24 as follows:
PARTS
SALE OF CORPORATE TAX CREDITS
24-36-501. Legislative declaration -tax preference performance
statement. ( 1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE CORPORATE TAX CREDITS AUTHORIZED BY THIS PART 5 ARE
NOT REFUNDABLE AND DO NOT IMPOSE AN OBLIGATION OF PAYMENT IN ANY
FUTURE YEAR ON THE ST AT E;
(b) THE USE OF PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF CORPORATE TAX
CREDITS DOES NOT REQUIRE THE STATE TO BORROW MONEY, EXTEND OR
PLEDGE THE STATE'S CREDIT, OR OBLIGATE THE STATE TO MAKE FUTURE
PAYMENTS FROM STA TE REVENUE;
( c) THE SALE AND USE OF THE CORPORA TE TAX CREDITS SHALL NOT
BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED AS CREA TING INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATION WHATSOEVER WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY
PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE LAWS OF THE STATE
CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE CREATION OF INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATION BY THE STA TE;
(d ) THE TAX CREDITS ALLOW A CORPORATION WITH AN INCOME TAX
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

LIABILITY TO PREPAY ITS TAX LIABILITY FOR FUTURE YEARS, WHICH DOES
NOT CONSTITUTE A TAX POLICY CHANGE UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION; AND
( e) ANY PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE
OFFSET BY DECREASES IN FUTURE REVENUE RES UL TING FROM THE BUYER'S
USE OF THE TAX CREDITS AND THEREFORE WILL NOT CAUSE A NET TAX
REVENUE GAIN UNDER SECTION 20 (4)(a) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(2) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND
DECLARESTHATTHEGENERALPURPOSESOFTHETAXCREDITSPROVIDEDFOR
IN THIS PART 5 ARE TO INDUCE CERTAIN DESIGNATED BEHAVIOR BY
TAXPAYERS AND PROVIDE A REDUCTION IN INCOME TAX LIABILITY FOR
CERTAIN BUSINESSES. SPECIFICALLY, THIS TAX EXPENDITURE IS INTENDED
TO INDUCE C CORPORATIONS TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS THAT WILL REDUCE
THEIR FUTURE INCOME TAX LIABILITY IN ORDER TO GENERATE MONEY FOR
THE GENERAL FUND.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE TAX CREDITS IN ACHIEVING THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION BASED ON THE
NUMBER AND VALUE OF THE CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE TOTA L AMOUNT OF
GENERAL FUND MONEY GENERATED. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL
PROVIDE THE STATE AUDITOR WITH INFORMATION REGARDING THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF CREDITS CLAIMED AND THE GENERAL FUND MONEY GENERA TED.
24-36-502. Definitions. As USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "C CORPORATION" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS IN SECTION
39-22-103 (2.5).
(2) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY.
(3) "INCOME TAX LIABILITY" MEANS THE LIABILITY IMPOSED BY
SECTION 39-22-301.
PAGE I I-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

(4) "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" MEANS AC CORPORATION AUTHORIZED
TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO THAT HAS OR WILL HAVE AN INCOME TAX
LIABILITY OWING TO THE STATE. "QUALIFIED TAXPAYER" ALSO INCLUDES A
C CORPORATION THAT RECEIVES OR ASSUMES A TAX CREDIT TRANSFERRED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 26-36-503 (7)(e).
(5) "TAX CREDIT" MEANS THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-503.
( 6) "TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS" OR "SALE PROCEEDS" MEANS THE
MONEY OR OTHER LIQUID ASSET ACCEPTABLE TO THE STATE TREASURER
THATAQUALIFIEDTAXPAYERPAYSTOTHEDEPARTMENTTHATISDEPOSITED
IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND CREAT ED IN SECTION
24-36-405 (1 ).
24-36-503. Corporate tax credits - purchase - authorization to
issue -terms -report. ( 1) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY PURCHASE INCOME
TAX CREDITS FROM THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
AND MAY APPLY THE TAX CREDITS AGAINST ITS INCOME TAX LIABILITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-504.
(2) (a) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5 AND
PART 4 OF THIS ARTICLE 36 EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF A TOTAL FACE VALUE
OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION DOLLARS OR TOTAL SALES
PROCEEDS OF UP TO ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS, PLUS ANY
REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING
COSTS.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT THIRD
PARTY TO CONDUCT OR CONSULT ON A BIDDING PROCESS AMONG QUALIFIED
TAXPAYERS TO PURCHASE THE TAX CREDITS.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH C CORPORATIONS IN
ADVANCE OF ISSUING ANY TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) AC CORPORATION AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN COLORADO
SEEKING TO PURCHASE TAX CREDITS MUST APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT IN
THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

(4) USING PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF
APPLICABLE, BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY, EACH C CORPORATION THAT
SUBMITS AN APPLICATION SHALL MAKE A TIMELY AND IRREVOCABLE OFFER,
CONTINGENT ONLY ON THE DEPARTMENT'S ISSUANCE TO THE C
CORPORATION OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES, TO MAKE A SPECIFIED
PURCHASE PAYMENT AMOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON DATES SPECIFIED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, WHICH MUST NOT BURDEN ANY SINGLE TAX YEAR. THE
OFFER MUST INCLUDE:
( a) THE REQUESTED AMOUNT OFTA X CREDITS, WHICH MUST NOT BE
LESS THAN ANY MINIMUM AMOUNT ESTABLISHED IN PROCEDURES BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY;
(b) THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE
AMOUNT FOR EACH TAX CREDIT DOLLAR REQUESTED. THE MINIMUM
PROPOSED TAX CREDIT PURCHASE AMOUNT MUST BE THE GREATER OF
EITHER:
(I) THE PERCENTAGE OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD PARTY DETERMINES TO BE CONSISTENT WITH MARKET CONDITIONS AS
OF THE OFFER DATE; OR
(II) EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE REQUESTED DOLLAR AMOUNT OF TAX
CREDITS; AND
( C) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT OR, IF APPLICABLE,
THE INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY REQUIRES.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH C
CORPORATION THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION INDICATING WHETHER THE C
CORPORATION HAS BEEN APPROVED AS A PURCHASER OFTA X CREDITS AND,
IF SO, THE AMOUNT OFTA X CREDITS ALLOCATED AND THE DA TE BY WHICH
PAYMENT OF THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS MUST BE MADE.
(6) ON RECEIPT OF PAYMENT OF THE SALE PROCEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE. THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST STATE:
(a) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INCOME TAX CREDITS THAT THE
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM;
(b) THEAMOUNTTHATTHEQUALIFIEDTAXPAYER HAS PAID FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES AND THE DATE OF THE
PAYMENT;
( C) THE DATES ON WHICH THE TAX CREDITS WILL BE AVAILABLE FOR
USE BY THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER;
( d) ANY PENALT IES OR OTHER REMEDIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE;
( e) THE PROCEDURES TO BE USED FOR TRANSFERRING OR ASSUMING
THE TAX CREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7)(e) OF THIS
SECTION;
(f) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
(g) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT AS A CONDITION OF ISSUING THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE.
(7) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO ANY QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX
CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES.
(b) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME THE DEPARTMENT SPECIFIES IS SUBJECT TO
A PENALT Y EQUAL TO TEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE PURCHASE PRICE
THAT REMAINS UNPAID. THE PENALTY MUST BE PAID TO THE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER DEMAND.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT MAY OFFER TO REALLOCATE THE DEFAULTED
TAX CREDITS AMONG OTHER QUALIFIED TAXPAYERS SO THAT THE RESULT
AFTER REALLOCATION IS THE SAME AS IF THE INITIAL ALLOCATION HAD BEEN
PERFORMED WITHOUT CONSIDERING THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATION TO THE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
( d) lFTHE REALLOCATION OFTA X CREDITS UNDER SUBSECTION (7)( c)
OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN THE PAYMENT BY ANOTHER QUALIFIED
TAXPAYEROFTHEAMOUNTOFTAXCREDITSALEPROCEEDSNOTPAIDBYTHE
DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER, THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER THAT FAILS TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT
SALE PROCEEDS WITHIN THE TIME SPECIFIED MAY A VOID THE IMPOSITION OF
THE PENALTY BY TRANSFERRING THE ALLOCATION OFTA X CREDITS TO A NEW
OR EXISTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE DUE
DATE OF THE DEFAULTED INSTALLMENT. ANY TRANSFEREE OF AN
ALLOCATION OF TAX CREDITS OF A DEFAULTING QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7) SHALL AGREE TO PAY THE TAX CREDIT SALE
PROCEEDS WITHIN FIVE DAYS AFTER THE DA TE OF THE TRANSFER.
(8) THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS PROVIDED BY A QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER IN RETURN FOR ATA X CREDIT CERTIFICATE MUST BE DEPOSITED
IN THE TAX CREDIT SALE PROCEEDS CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
24-36-405 (1).
(9) (a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS
AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR, A DA TA FILE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH IT ISSUES TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5. THE DATA FILE MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND FEDERAL EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF
EACH QUALIFIED TAXPAYER TO WHICH THE DEPARTMENT ISSUED A TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE;
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOCATED TO THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER; AND
(III) THE SERIAL NUMBER OF THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF EACH TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED, TRANSFERRED, OR ASSUMED THAT ARE
SUFFICIENT TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO VERIFY THE
ISSUANCE AND OWNERSHIP OF THE CREDIT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE THE RECORDS TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR UPON
REQUEST SO THAT THE STATE AUDITOR CAN EVALUATE THE EFFECTIVENESS
OFTHETAXCREDITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 24-36-501 (2)(b) AND
39-21-305.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

(10) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PAY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD PARTY AND
ANY CONSULTANTS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE,
MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS USING THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF
TAX CREDITS.
24-36-504. Use of corporate income tax credits - carry over.
(1) FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN FISCAL YEAR 2025-26, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF ST ATE PLANNING AND
BUDGETING, PRIOR TO THE SALE, MAY DETERMINE THE TAX YEARS IN WHICH
THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CLAIM THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S TAX
CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S INCOME TAX LIABILITY.
(2) FOR THE TAX YEAR SPECIFIED IN THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE
ISSUED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-34-503 (6), THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER
MAY CLAIM THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE QUALIFIED
TAXPAYER'S INCOME TAX LIABILITY. IF THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT
EXCEEDS THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER'S ACTUAL TAX LIABILITY FOR THAT TAX
YEAR, THE EXCESS IS NOT REFUNDED TO THE QUALIFIED TAXPAYER. THE
QUALIFIED TAXPAYER MAY CARRY FORWARD AND APPLY THE UNUSED TAX
CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY FOR ANY SUCCEEDING TAX
YEAR; EXCEPT THAT THE TAX CREDIT MAY NOT BE CARRIED FOR WARD TO A
TAX YEAR THAT BEGINS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2033. THE TAXPAYER SHALL
APPLY THE CARRY FOR WARD CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAX LIABILITY
FOR THE EARLIEST OF THE INCOME TAX YEARS POSSIBLE. ANY AMOUNT OF
THE TAX CREDIT THAT IS NOT USED AFTER THIS PERIOD IS NOT REFUNDABLE.
(3) A QUALIFIED TAXPAYER CLAIMING A CREDIT UNDER THIS PART 5
SHALL SUBMIT THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE WITH ITS TAX RETURN.
24-36-505. Repeal of part. THIS PART 5 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE
DECEMBER 31, 2040.
SECTION 3. Appropriation. For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$3,173,500 is appropriated to the department oft reasury. This appropriation
is from the tax credit sale proceeds cash fund created in section 24-36-405,
C.R.S. To implement this act, the department may use this appropriation for
tax credit administration.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
Ju~ James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
Connor Randall Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED o Y \ To v~d ~ ¥tva u~-+ 2 'o 1"" 2fJ 2-S o-. ~ ct :~ 5 ~
h""I
(Date and Time)
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 25B-1004